Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-508
Archaeological resource or archaeological site; prohibited acts; penalty.

No person shall enter or attempt to enter upon the lands of another without permission and intentionally appropriate, excavate, injure, or destroy any archaeological resource or any archaeological site. Any person committing such act is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 2005, LB 211, § 8.